Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-805
Membership; withdrawal.

Any member may withdraw by surrendering his or her policy for cancellation at any time by giving notice in writing to the secretary of the association and paying the amount of his or her share of all claims then existing against the company in accordance with the bylaws of the company.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 127, p. 463;

R.S.1913, § 3264;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. X, § 4, p. 645;

C.S.1922, § 7863;

C.S.1929, § 44-904;

R.S.1943, § 44-805;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 163.

Under facts herein, insurance company was not an assessment association. Western Life & Accident Co. v. State Ins. Board, 101 Neb. 152, 162 N.W. 530 (1917).